Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2498XC (2) 91 ss/ko S.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 148.4 Emeritus license. 1 1. The board shall grant an emeritus license to a physician 2 and surgeon or osteopathic physician and surgeon who is 3 at least sixty years of age, who is or will be primarily 4 engaged in the practice of supervising and training resident 5 physicians, and who submits an application on a form prescribed 6 by the board. 7 2. An emeritus license issued pursuant to this section shall 8 entitle the licensee to maintain the same scope of practice 9 as the licensee had as a physician and surgeon or osteopathic 10 physician and surgeon. 11 3. An emeritus license issued pursuant to this section shall 12 be valid for three years from the date of issue and may be 13 renewed once. 14 4. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a 15 licensee licensed pursuant to this section is not required to 16 complete continuing education credits to maintain or renew an 17 emeritus license. 18 5. The application and renewal fee for an emeritus license 19 shall be one half of the application and renewal fees for 20 a license to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic 21 medicine and surgery. 22 6. The board shall adopt rules for the implementation 23 of this section, including a rule that defines âprimarily 24 engaged in the practice of supervising and training resident 25 physiciansâ. 26